Utah statutes.
31A-23a-104.   Application for individual license -- Application for agency
license.
(1)  This section applies to an initial or renewal license as a:
(a)  producer;
(b)  limited line producer;
(c)  customer service representative;
(d)  consultant;
(e)  managing general agent; or
(f)  reinsurance intermediary.
(2) (a)  Subject to Subsection (2)(b), an application for an initial or
renewal individual license shall be:
(i)  made to the commissioner on forms and in a manner the commissioner
prescribes; and
(ii)  accompanied by a license fee that is not refunded if the application:
(A)  is denied; or
(B)  if incomplete, is never completed by the applicant.
(b)  An application described in this Subsection (2) shall provide:
(i)  information about the applicant's identity;
(ii)  the applicant's Social Security number;
(iii)  the applicant's personal history, experience, education, and business
record;
(iv)  whether the applicant is 18 years of age or older;
(v)  whether the applicant has committed an act that is a ground for denial,
suspension, or revocation as set forth in Section 31A-23a-105 or 31A-23a-111;
and
(vi)  any other information the commissioner reasonably requires.
(3)  The commissioner may require a document reasonably necessary to verify
the information contained in an application filed under this section.
(4)  An applicant's Social Security number contained in an application filed
under this section is a private record under Section 63G-2-302.
(5) (a)  Subject to Subsection (5)(b), an application for an initial or
renewal agency license shall be:
(i)  made to the commissioner on forms and in a manner the commissioner
prescribes; and
(ii)  accompanied by a license fee that is not refunded if the application:
(A)  is denied; or
(B)  if incomplete, is never completed by the applicant.
(b)  An application described in Subsection (5)(a) shall provide:
(i)  information about the applicant's identity;
(ii)  the applicant's federal employer identification number;
(iii)  the designated responsible licensed producer;
(iv)  the identity of all owners, partners, officers, and directors;
(v)  whether the applicant has committed an act that is a ground for denial,
suspension, or revocation as set forth in Section 31A-23a-105 or 31A-23a-111;
and
(vi)  any other information the commissioner reasonably requires.
